Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
327

MEDICAL
AND RESEARCH USE OF BODIES

Part I. Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act

Section

327-1 Short title

327-2 Definitions

327-3 Applicability

327-4 Who may make an anatomical gift before
donor's death

327-5 Manner of making an anatomical gift
before donor's

death

327-6 Amending or revoking an anatomical gift
before donor's

death

327-7 Refusal to make an anatomical gift and
effect of

refusal

327-8 Preclusive effect of an anatomical gift,
amendment, or

revocation

327-9 Who may make an anatomical gift of
decedent's body or

body part

327-10 Manner of making, amending, or revoking
an anatomical

gift of decedent's body or body part

327-11 Persons that may receive anatomical gift;
purpose of

anatomical gift

327-12 Search and notification

327-13 Delivery of document of gift not
required; right to

examine

327-14 Rights and duties of procurement organization
and

others

327-15 Coordination of procurement and use

327-16 Sale or purchase of body parts prohibited

327-17 Penalty

327-18 Immunity

327-19 Law governing validity; choice of law as
to execution

of document of gift; presumption of
validity

327-20 Donor registry

327-21 Effect of anatomical gift on advance
health-care

directive

327-22 Cooperation between medical examiner or
coroner and

procurement organization

327-23 Facilitation of an anatomical gift from a
decedent

whose body is under the jurisdiction of
the medical

examiner or coroner

327-24 Hawaii organ and tissue education special
fund

327-25 Uniformity of application and
construction

327-26 Relation to Electronic Signatures in
Global and

National Commerce Act

Part II. Disposition of Dead Human Bodies

327-31 Repealed

327-32 Administration; duties of health officers

327-33 to 35 Repealed

327-36 Final disposition of bodies retained for
medical

education and research purposes

327-37 Repealed

327-38 Prohibitions; penalty

327-39 Immunity from liability

Part III. General Provisions

327-51 Exemption from strict liability

327-52 Requests for anatomical gifts

Note

Developing an organ donor registry. L 2008, c 165.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next